District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
be cited as the “Responsible Budgeting for Juvenile Safety Laws Amendment Act”.
Sec. 2. Section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved October
16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a(c)), is amended by adding a new
subsection (d) to read as follows:
“(d) A fiscal impact statement prepared in accordance with subsection (a) of this section
for any bill amending Titles 22-24, creating or modifying any criminal penalty, or modifying the

process for juvenile delinquency proceedings in Title 16 shall include any anticipated increase or
decrease in costs, over the financial plan, to the District of detaining, committing, and
rehabilitating juveniles. Whenever the population of a secure detention or residential facility for
juveniles exceeds ninety percent of the facility’s capacity and legislation under consideration by
the Council is projected to result in an increase in the population of juveniles detained or
committed, the fiscal impact statement shall include the capital costs of increasing capacity by at
least ten percent.”
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.